Massachusetts, session 194th, H2799.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 9E of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is amended by inserting at the end of the last sentence thereof the following new 
sentence:- In the event that the governmental unit approves an increase in the percent of the 
premium to be contributed by its retired employees, the percent of premium being paid by a 
retired employee at that time will not be increased to the higher percent. 
SECTION 2. The provisions of this act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.